Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-101.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 11-101.1. A. The board of education of each public


school district and the governing body of each public charter school


shall permit those students and teachers employees who wish to do so


to participate in voluntary prayer.


B. The board of education of each public school district and


the governing body of each public charter school shall adopt a

Req. No. 2559 Page 1


policy requiring that students and employees be given an opportunity


to participate in a period of prayer and reading of the Bible or


other religious text during each school day. The policy adopted


pursuant to this subsection:


1. Shall contain the following statement: “It is the policy of


(name of public school district or public charter school) that every


student and employee be provided a period of prayer and reading of


the Bible or other religious text.”;


2. Shall require, as a condition of participation in a period


of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text, that an


employee or the parent or legal guardian of a student submit to the


school district or charter school a signed consent form that


includes:


a. an acknowledgment that the student or employee has a


choice whether to participate,


b. a statement that the employee or the parent or legal


guardian of the student has no objection to the


student participating in or hearing the prayers or


readings offered during the period, and


c. an express waiver of the right to bring a claim


arising out of the adoption of a policy pursuant to


the provisions of this section including a claim under


the Establishment Clause of the First Amendment to the


United States Constitution or related state or federal

Req. No. 2559 Page 2


law. The waiver shall release the school district or


charter school and its employees from liability for


such claims brought in state or federal court;


3. Shall prohibit the provision of a prayer or reading of the


Bible or other religious text over a public address system;


4. Shall specify that a period of prayer and reading of the


Bible or other religious text may not be a substitute for


instructional time;


5. Shall include provisions ensuring a prayer or reading of the


Bible or other religious text is not knowingly or intentionally


provided in the physical presence of, within hearing of, or in


another manner that would constitute an injury in fact within the


meaning of the United States Constitution or the Oklahoma


Constitution on a person for whom a signed consent form has not been


submitted pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection B of this section or


has been revoked pursuant to subsection C of this section;


6. May allow that the period of prayer and reading of the Bible


or other religious text be provided before normal school hours or


only in classrooms or other areas occupied by employees and students


who have all submitted signed consent forms as provided by paragraph


of this subsection; and


7. May provide opportunities for voluntary participation in


individual or group activities.



Req. No. 2559 Page 3


C. A public school district or public charter school employee


or the parent or legal guardian of a public school district or


public charter school student may revoke the signed consent form


provided pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection B of this section at


any time by providing written notification to the school district or


charter school. A school district or charter school employee who


has revoked a signed consent form or a student whose parent or legal


guardian has revoked a signed consent form:


1. Shall not participate in the period of prayer and reading of


the Bible or other religious text; and


2. Shall remain subject to the waiver provided by subparagraph


c of paragraph 2 of subsection B of this section.


D. Upon request from the board of education of a public school


district or the governing body of a public charter school, the


Attorney General shall:


1. Provide advice on best methods for a school district or


charter school to comply with the requirements of this section;


2. Provide a model signed consent form that may be used to


comply with the provisions of paragraph 2 of subsection B of this


section; and


3. Defend the school district or charter school in a cause of


action arising out of the adoption of a policy required by this


section. The state shall be liable for the expenses, costs,



Req. No. 2559 Page 4


judgments, or settlements of claims arising pursuant to this


section.


E. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit a public


school district or public charter school employee or student from


participating in a period of prayer and reading of the Bible or


other religious text during a time and place not designated by the


policy adopted pursuant to this section.


F. Nothing in this act shall be construed to be in conflict


with Section 11-101 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2559 EB 1/6/2026 12:24:35 PM

















Req. No. 2559 Page 5